Wisconsin, session 2025, SB765.
do enact as follows:SB765,11Section 1. 632.866 (1) (a) of the statutes is renumbered 632.866 (1) (ar).SB765,22Section 2. 632.866 (1) (ag) of the statutes is created to read:SB765,2,63632.866 (1) (ag) “Cancer-associated condition” means any symptom or side 4effect that is associated with metastatic cancer or the treatment of metastatic 5cancer and that, in the judgment of a health care provider, further jeopardizes the 6health of a patient if left untreated.SB765,37Section 3. 632.866 (1) (cm) of the statutes is created to read:SB765,2,108632.866 (1) (cm) “Metastatic cancer” means cancer that has spread from the 9primary or original site of the cancer to nearby tissues, lymph nodes, or other areas 10or parts of the body.SB765,411Section 4. 632.866 (2m) of the statutes is created to read:SB765,2,1512632.866 (2m) Step therapy protocol prohibited. An insurer, pharmacy 13benefit manager, or utilization review organization may not require a step therapy 14protocol for a drug that is prescribed for metastatic cancer or a cancer-associated 15condition and the use of the drug is all of the following:SB765,2,1616(a) Approved by the federal food and drug administration.SB765,2,1817(b) Consistent with best practices for the treatment of metastatic cancer or the 18cancer-associated condition.SB765,2,2019(c) Supported by peer-reviewed publications that are based on evidence-based 20research.SB765,2,2121